New York, session 2025-2026, S2159.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The environmental conservation law is amended by adding a 2 new section 27-0111 to read as follows: 3 § 27-0111. Illegal dumping on public property. 4 1. For the purpose of this section the term "dump" or "dumping" shall 5 mean to throw, dump, deposit or place, or cause to be thrown, dumped, 6 deposited or placed any refuse, trash, garbage, rubbish, litter or any 7 nauseous or offensive matter in an area not licensed or permitted to 8 receive such refuse, trash, garbage, rubbish, litter or nauseous or 9 offensive matter. 10 2. In addition to any penalties imposed under section 16-119 of the 11 administrative code of the city of New York, no person shall dump or 12 perform an act of dumping upon any sidewalk, street, lot, park, public 13 place, wharf, pier, dock, bulkhead, slip, navigable waterway or any 14 other area publicly owned by the state or a municipality. 15 3. A violation of subdivision two of this section shall be punishable 16 by a fine of five hundred dollars for the first offense and one thousand 17 dollars for a second and subsequent offense. If site clean-up is deemed 18 necessary by the commissioner as a result of a violation of this 19 section, the offender shall also be subject to a fine equal to the sum 20 of any and all expenses incurred in the clean-up or decontamination of 21 such dumping site. 22 4. In addition to any reward set forth in subdivision f of section 23 16-119 of the administrative code of the city of New York, a witness to 24 a violation set forth in subdivision two of this section may submit 25 evidence of such violation to the commissioner. If such evidence leads EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD04879-01-5 S. 2159 2 1 to a fine for such violation, the commissioner shall offer as a reward 2 to such witness in an amount that is at the discretion of the commis- 3 sioner. Evidence of a violation may include but not be limited to: 4 (a) a video of the dumping; or 5 (b) a picture of a license plate of a vehicle suspected of dumping. 6 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately.